Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-171
Records; destruction; liability; excuse for failure to produce.

No liability shall accrue against any bank destroying any such records after the expiration of the time provided in section 8-170. In any cause or proceedings in which any such records or files may be called in question or be demanded of the bank or any officer or employee thereof, a showing that such records or files have been destroyed in accordance with the terms of sections 8-170 to 8-174 shall be a sufficient excuse for the failure to produce them.

Laws 1949, c. 10, § 2, p. 71;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,112;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 71, p. 162.